Maryland, session 2025, HB0385.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Commercial Law
13–301.
Unfair, abusive, or deceptive trade practices include any:
(14) Violation of a provision of:
(xliv) Title 14, Subtitle 49 of this article; [or]
(xlv) Section 12–6C–09.1 of the Health Occupations Article; or
(XLVI) SECTION 14–1328 OF THIS ARTICLE; OR
14–1328.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “POINT–OF–SALE SYSTEM” MEANS A DIGITAL DEVICE USED TO
PROCESS ELECTRONIC TRANSACTIONS FOR THE PURCHASE OF GOODS OR SERVICES.
(3) “TIP” MEANS AN ADDITIONAL PAYMENT VOLUNTARILY MADE BY A
CUSTOMER IN RECOGNITION OF SERVICE PROVIDED TO THE CUSTOMER.
(B) BEGINNING JANUARY JULY 1, 2026, EACH BUSINESS THAT USES A
POINT–OF–SALE SYSTEM THAT DURING A TRANSACTION AUTOMATICALLY DISPLAYS
A SCREEN PROMPTING THE CUSTOMER TO SELECT AN AMOUNT FOR A TIP SHALL
CONSPICUOUSLY DISPLAY ON THE SAME SCREEN:
(1) INFORMATION DISCLOSING TO WHOM THE TIP WILL BE
ALLOCATED ON THE SAME SCREEN OR ON A PREVIOUS SCREEN, A NOTICE
DISCLOSING THAT THE TIP IS FOR EMPLOYEES; AND

HOUSE BILL 385 3
(2) A ON THE SAME SCREEN, A TIP AMOUNT SET AT ZERO BY DEFAULT
OR A “NO–TIP” OPTION.
(C) A DISCLOSURE UNDER SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION IS SUBJECT TO
THE RECORD–KEEPING REQUIREMENTS UNDER § 3–424 OF THE LABOR AND
EMPLOYMENT ARTICLE.
(D) THE DIVISION OF CONSUMER PROTECTION SHALL ADOPT
REGULATIONS NECESSARY TO ADMINISTER AND ENFORCE THIS SECTION THIS
SECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO PAYMENT TRANSACTIONS:
(1) FOR GOODS OR SERVICES PROVIDED TO CUSTOMERS SEATED AT
A TABLE OR BAR; OR
(2) MADE BY A CUSTOMER FOR GOODS OR SERVICES:
(I) THROUGH A CUSTOMER’S MOBILE DEVICE; OR
(II) ONLINE.
(E) THE MARYLAND DEPARTMENT OF LABOR AND THE DIVISION OF
CONSUMER PROTECTION IN THE OFFICE OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL SHALL MAKE
INFORMATION ABOUT THE REQUIREMENTS OF THIS SECTION AVAILABLE ON THE
AGENCIES’ PUBLIC WEBSITES.
(E) (F) A VIOLATION OF THIS SECTION IS:
(1) AN UNFAIR, ABUSIVE, OR DECEPTIVE TRADE PRACTICE WITHIN
THE MEANING OF TITLE 13 OF THIS ARTICLE; AND
(2) SUBJECT TO THE ENFORCEMENT AND PENALTY PROVISIONS
CONTAINED IN TITLE 13 OF THIS ARTICLE, EXCEPT §§ 13–408 AND 13–411 OF THIS
ARTICLE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.